Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-201
Department of Agriculture; general powers; documents related to Healthy Soils Task Force; duties.

(1) The Department of Agriculture may:

(a) Encourage and promote, in every practicable manner, the interest of agriculture;

(b) Promote methods of conducting the industry of agriculture with a view to increasing the production and facilitating the distribution thereof at the least cost;

(c) Collect and publish statistics relating to the production and marketing of agricultural products, so far as such statistical information may be of value to the agricultural and allied interests of the state, and cooperate with the federal government in the matter of collecting and publishing such statistical information;

(d) Distribute or dispose of any remaining Weeds of the Great Plains books and supplemental inserts thereto that are in the possession of the department. By January 1, 2027, the State Treasurer shall transfer all money in the Weed Book Cash Fund to the Noxious Weed Cash Fund. All money collected from the sale of the publications shall be remitted to the State Treasurer and credited to the Noxious Weed Cash Fund;

(e) Inquire into the causes of contagious, infectious, and communicable diseases among domestic animals and the means for the prevention and cure of the same;

(f) Execute and enforce all laws relating to matters within its jurisdiction and adopt and promulgate necessary rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of such laws;

(g) Employ special investigators who shall be appointed deputy state sheriffs by the Governor and who shall, upon qualifying for such office, possess all the powers which attach to such office, except that their powers and duties shall be restricted to the enforcement of the laws of the State of Nebraska within the jurisdiction of the Department of Agriculture;

(h) Perform laboratory testing services as provided in section 81-2,293; and

(i) Enforce the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act.

(2) Prior to January 1, 2027, the Department of Agriculture shall electronically submit, to the Clerk of the Legislature, the following relating to the Healthy Soils Task Force created under Laws 2019, LB243, section 2:

(a) A copy of the comprehensive action plan submitted pursuant to section 2-404, as such section existed on January 1, 2021;

(b) A copy of the findings and recommendations reported pursuant to section 2-404, as such section existed on January 1, 2021; and

(c) A copy of the agendas, meeting minutes, and any other documents submitted by the task force to the department.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. III, art. I, § 1, p. 453;

C.S.1922, § 7294;

C.S.1929, § 81-501;

R.S.1943, § 81-201;

Laws 1959, c. 424, § 3, p. 1424;

Laws 1963, c. 509, § 1, p. 1622;

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 22, p. 1462;

Laws 1973, LB 201, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 320, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 976, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 460, § 6;

Laws 2004, LB 869, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 51, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 21;

Laws 2026, LB794, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 11.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB794, section 3, with LB948, section 11, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB794 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB948 became effective March 17, 2026.
Animal Health and Disease Control Act, see section 54-2901.

Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act, see section 76-3701.

Nebraska State Board of Agriculture is a corporation possessing no immunity from the enforcement of its honest debts and just obligations by the ordinary processes of the courts. Crete Mills v. Nebraska State Board of Agriculture, 132 Neb. 244, 271 N.W. 684 (1937).